New York, session 2025-2026, A1563.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph 2 of paragraph i of subdivision 3 of section 2 467-b of the real property tax law, as added by chapter 424 of the laws 3 of 2015, is amended to read as follows: 4 (2) a landlord of any housing accommodation subject to provisions of 5 the local emergency housing rent control act, the emergency tenant 6 protection act of nineteen seventy-four or any local laws enacted pursu- 7 ant thereto, the emergency housing rent control law or the rent stabili- 8 zation law of nineteen hundred sixty-nine shall, at least once annually, 9 [including] include with [a] all new [lease and all] and renewal leases, 10 and on any rent bills, including any rent bills via electronic communi- 11 cation, delivered to the occupant of such accommodation[,] provide the 12 informational material describing eligibility for and the benefits of 13 the senior citizen rent increase exemption program and the disability 14 rent increase exemption program, as provided by the entity administering 15 the program pursuant to subparagraph one of this paragraph. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 17 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04268-03-5